Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SANNEH FOUNDATION; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Sanneh Foundation, a nonprofit organization, to fund out-of-school and summer programs focused on mentoring and behavioral, social, and emotional learning interventions and enrichment activities directed toward low-income students of color. This appropriation is onetime and available until spent. new text end